Tennessee, session 114, HB0210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-115(b), is amended by
deleting the language "and publish annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical
information" and substituting instead the language "and publish biannually statistical
information".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0210
000126
- 1 -